Utah statutes.
10-5-106.   Funds for which budget prepared.
The mayor shall prepare for each budget year a budget for: (1) the general
fund, including state allocated road funds; (2) special revenue funds; (3)
debt service funds; (4) capital improvement funds; and (5) enterprise funds.
